Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.316

Law governing.

A foreign limited liability company registered to do business in this state is subject to RCW 23.95.500 relating to the effect of registration and the governing law for registered foreign limited liability companies.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7117; 2015 c 188 s 62.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.